Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.330

Microcredentials.

The Washington professional educator standards board is prohibited from expanding the use of microcredentials beyond the microcredential pilot grant programs in existence on May 8, 2019, unless and until the legislature directs the board to do so.

[ 2019 c 295 s 306.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.